Utah statutes.
31A-26-101.   Purposes.

The purposes of this chapter are:

(1)  to promote the professional competence of those engaged in claims adjusting;

(2)  to encourage fair and rapid settlement of claims;

(3)  to protect claimants under insurance policies from unfair claims adjustment practices;

(4)  to prevent compensation arrangements for insurance adjusters that endanger the fairness of claim settlements; and

(5)  to govern the qualifications and procedures for the licensing of insurance adjusters.

